District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Commercial Driver’s License Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Uniform Classification and Commercial Driver’s License Act of 1990,
effective September 20, 1990 (D.C. Law 8-161; D.C. Official Code § 50-401 et seq.), is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 2(2) (D.C. Official Code § 50-401(2)) is amended by striking the phrase “the
informational system established pursuant to the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986,
approved October 27, 1986 (100 Stat. 3207; 49 U.S.C. sec. 2701 et seq.) (“Commercial Motor
Vehicle Safety Act”),” and inserting the phrase “the information system maintained by the
Secretary of Transportation pursuant to 49 U.S.C. § 31309” in its place.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 50-402) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “under section 12005(a) of
the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act (49 U.S.C. sec. 2704(a));” and inserting the phrase
“under 49 U.S.C. § 31305;” in its place.
(2) The lead-in language of paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “to
section 12007 of the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act (49 U.S.C. sec. 2706)” and inserting
the phrase “to 49 U.S.C. § 31309” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the phrase “by section 12009 of the
Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act (49 U.S.C. sec. 2708).” and inserting the phrase “by 49
U.S.C. § 31311.” in its place.
(c) Section 7 (D.C. Official Code § 50-406) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 7. Disqualification.
“The Mayor shall disqualify a person from the operation of a commercial motor vehicle
if:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(1) The person has been convicted of an offense specified in 49 C.F.R. § 383.51,
and the person shall be disqualified for the time period set forth therein;
“(2) The person’s driving has been determined to constitute an imminent hazard,
as specified in 49 C.F.R. § 383.52(a), and the person shall be disqualified for a time period not to
exceed the time periods set forth in 49 C.F.R. § 383.52(b) and (c);
“(3) The person has been determined, consistent with section 8b of the District of
Columbia Traffic Act, 1925, effective March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-279; D.C. Official Code §
50-1401.04), to have falsified information specified in 49 C.F.R. § 383.73(j), and the person
shall be disqualified for at least the minimum time period set forth therein; or
“(4) The person has been convicted of fraud related to the issuance of a
commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit, or has failed to timely take a
knowledge or skills retest or fails a knowledge or skills retest after suspected fraud, as provided
in 49 C.F.R. § 383.73(k), and the person shall be disqualified for the time period set forth
therein.”.
Sec. 3. Section 8b(e) of the District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925, effective March 14,
2007 (D.C. Law 16-279; D.C. Official Code § 50-1401.04(e)), is amended by striking the period
and inserting the phrase “, or any other material or information required to obtain a commercial
driver’s license.” in its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3